District of Columbia statutes.
9-924

Act liberally construed.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the District and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

History

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 25, 32 DCR 6093

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1274.